Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6834YC (4) 91 da/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 459.102, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. âAnimalâ means cattle, swine, horses, sheep, chickens, 3 turkeys, or fish , or shellfish . 4 Sec. 2. Section 459.102, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraphs: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . n. Shellfish weighing twenty-five 7 grams or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.001 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Shellfish weighing less than 9 twenty-five grams . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00006 10